Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.070

Authority of secretary.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) Issue a certificate to an applicant who has met the requirements for certification and deny a certificate to an applicant who does not meet the minimum qualifications;

(4) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter and hire individuals, including those certified under this chapter, to serve as consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter;

(5) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and certificate holders;

(6) Conduct a hearing, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, on an appeal of a denial of certification based on the applicant's failure to meet the minimum qualifications for certification;

(7) Investigate alleged violations of this chapter and consumer complaints involving the practice of persons representing themselves as certified dietitians or certified nutritionists;

(8) Issue subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent to deny certifications, and orders and delegate in writing to a designee the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of charges, and statements on intent to deny certifications;

(9) Conduct disciplinary proceedings, impose sanctions, and assess fines for violations of this chapter or any rules adopted under it in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;

(10) Set all certification, renewal, and late renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250; and

(11) Set certification expiration dates and renewal periods for all certifications under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 151 s 301; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 516; 1991 c 3 s 284; 1988 c 277 s 10.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.